Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1 SOLID WASTES DISPOSAL SITES AND FACILITIES
30-20-105. Certificate - state financial assurance requirements.

If the governing body having jurisdiction deems that a certificate of designation should be granted to the applicant, it shall issue the certificate, and such certificate shall be displayed in a prominent place at the site and facility. Such governing body shall not issue a certificate of designation if the department has recommended disapproval pursuant to section 30-20-103.

No governing body having jurisdiction shall require an applicant for a certificate of designation to obtain any financial assurance mechanism or amount in addition to that required by the provisions of section 30-20-104.5.

The department, on behalf of the solid and hazardous waste commission, shall consult the governing body having jurisdiction prior to the promulgation of the rules called for in this section and prior to accepting a financial assurance. The recommendations of such governing body shall be considered in formulating the rules and establishing the amount of financial assurance to be posted.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 760, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-5.

L. 71:

p. 342, § 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 967, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1279, § 4, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 2187, § 71, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 1135, § 18, effective July 1.

30-20-106. Private disposal prohibited - when. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 67:

p. 760, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-6.

L. 71:

p. 343, § 7.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1360, § 7, effective July 1.

30-20-107. Designation of exclusive sites and facilities.

The governing body of any county or municipality may by ordinance designate and approve one or more solid wastes disposal sites and facilities, either within or without its corporate limits, if designated and approved by the governing body having jurisdiction, as its exclusive solid wastes disposal site and facility or sites and facilities, and thereafter each such site and facility shall be used by such county or municipality for the disposal of its solid wastes; but, prior to any such designation and approval, such governing body shall hold a public hearing to review the disposal method to be used and the fees to be charged, if any.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 760, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-7.

L. 71:

p. 343, § 8.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 967, § 8, effective June 5.

30-20-107.5. Operation of landfill gas facilities within solid wastes disposal sites and facilities.

The governing body of any municipality or county shall have the authority to make such provisions as may be necessary for the operation of landfill gas facilities within any solid wastes disposal site or facility under its jurisdiction to enable the municipality or county to exercise its powers relating to landfill gas operations under sections 30-11-307 and 31-15-716, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire section added, p. 653, § 4, effective July 1.

30-20-108. Contracts with governmental units authorized.

An approved solid wastes disposal site and facility may be operated by any person pursuant to contract with any governmental unit.

Any municipality or county acting by itself or in association with any other such governmental unit may establish and operate an approved site and facility under such terms and conditions as may be approved by the governing bodies of the governmental units involved.

Any county or municipality acting by itself or in association with any other such governmental unit may acquire by condemnation such sites as are needed for trash disposal purposes.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 760, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-8.

L. 71:

p. 343, § 9.

L. 91:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 968, § 9, effective June 5.

30-20-109. Commission to promulgate rules - definitions.

The solid and hazardous waste commission shall promulgate rules for the engineering design and operation of solid wastes disposal sites and facilities, which may include:

The establishment of engineering design criteria applicable, but not limited, to protection of surface and subsurface waters, suitable soil characteristics, distance from solid wastes generation centers, access routes, distance from water wells, disposal facility on-site traffic control patterns, insect and rodent control, methods of solid wastes compaction in the disposal fill, confinement of windblown debris, recycling operations, fire prevention, and final closure of the compacted fill;

The establishment of criteria for solid wastes disposal sites and facilities which will place into operation the engineering design for such disposal sites and facilities;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 958, § 3, effective July 1, 1991.)

The establishment of a reviewing fee to be charged by the department for the review of any written recommendation and findings of a private contractor who has acted in lieu of the department to review an application for a solid wastes disposal site and facility under the provisions of section

30-20-103.7

for compliance with the state's requirements. Such fee shall not exceed actual and reasonable costs and shall not exceed five thousand dollars.

The establishment of a fee for the technical review described in section

30-20-119 (2)

, which fee shall not exceed ten thousand dollars, or the actual cost of such technical review.

(1.5) (a) As used in this subsection (1.5):

"EP waste" means exploration and production waste, as that term is defined in section

34-60-103

, C.R.S.

"EP waste disposal facility" means a commercial solid wastes disposal site and facility that accepts the deposit of EP waste.

The solid and hazardous waste commission shall promulgate rules that are specifically applicable to the deposit of EP waste at an EP waste disposal facility. The rules shall include the following:

Mandatory set-backs of EP waste disposal facilities of one-half mile from all residences, educational facilities, day care centers, hospitals, nursing homes, jails, hotels, motels, other occupied structures, or outside activity areas such as parks and playing fields as designated in the rules;

Mandatory fabricated liners and monitoring requirements as necessary to prevent the migration of EP waste to groundwater;

Waste analysis and reporting requirements to ensure that only EP waste is disposed of at an EP waste disposal facility;

Fencing and netting requirements to prevent the public and wildlife from accessing EP waste disposal facilities;

Contingency plans to respond to emergencies, including adequate freeboard, overflow ponds, or both; and

Financial assurance requirements that are adequate to cover closure and reclamation costs.

Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection (1.5), an EP waste disposal facility that accepted EP waste on or before June 4, 2008, and that had not begun closure by June 4, 2008, shall:

File an application pursuant to section

30-20-103

within three months after the rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection (1.5) become effective with the governing body having jurisdiction to amend the facility's certificate of designation to incorporate the requirements specified in the rules; and

Comply with the rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection (1.5) within twenty-four months after they become effective, unless the EP waste disposal facility demonstrates to the department no later than eighteen months after the rules become effective why it cannot timely comply with the rules and the department agrees to a compliance schedule. In such case, the department may extend the compliance deadline to no more than thirty-six months after the rules become effective; except that nothing in this subsection (1.5) shall be deemed to:

Require an EP waste disposal facility that lawfully accepted EP waste on or before June 4, 2008, to comply with the set-back requirements of this subsection (1.5); or

Place an EP waste disposal facility into noncompliance because of an alleged violation of a set-back requirement of this subsection (1.5) due solely to the fact that a residential or other occupied structure or a designated outside activity area is established within the set-back distance on or after issuance of the certificate of designation pursuant to this subsection (1.5).

The department shall:

Coordinate with the Colorado oil and gas conservation commission created in section

34-60-104

, C.R.S., governing bodies having jurisdiction, and the federal bureau of land management to identify potential EP waste disposal sites that are located reasonably close to oil and gas operation areas on either federal or nonfederal land and that meet the set-back requirements of this subsection (1.5); and

To the extent practicable, encourage governing bodies having jurisdiction and the federal bureau of land management to approve the siting of EP waste disposal sites at locations identified pursuant to this paragraph (d) when so requested by a commercial operator.

Upon the recommendation of the department, the solid and hazardous waste commission may waive, for individual impoundments, the requirement imposed pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1.5) that an EP waste disposal facility that accepted EP waste on or before June 4, 2008, but had not begun closure by that date, must install fabricated liners. The department may recommend a waiver only if all of the following conditions are met:

There have been no unpermitted discharges to groundwater or surface water from the operation of the facility;

Each impoundment for which a waiver is requested is located more than one thousand feet from any public or private water well or surface water;

The owner or operator complies with mandatory monitoring and reporting requirements as determined by the department, including, but not limited to, individual impoundment leak detection monitoring; and

The owner or operator is not subject to any outstanding compliance orders or enforcement actions with regard to the design, operation, or closure of the facility.

If, at any time, the department determines that one or more of the conditions specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e) are no longer met, the department may bring the relevant information to the solid and hazardous waste commission with a recommendation to rescind the waiver of the requirement to install fabricated liners. If the solid and hazardous waste commission determines that one or more of the conditions are no longer being met, the solid and hazardous waste commission may rescind the waiver and instruct the department to establish a compliance schedule for the owner or operator to install fabricated liners.

The solid and hazardous waste commission may promulgate rules concerning:

The establishment of an initial examination of each application for a solid wastes disposal site and facility to establish the completeness of the information submitted. Such initial examination shall be completed within thirty days after the department receives such application, and the department shall mail written notification to an applicant and to the governing body having jurisdiction within such time period stating the decision of the department to begin its review of such application or to reject the application based on incompleteness.

The establishment of a fee for the review of solid wastes disposal site and facility submittals and the preoperation inspection for such site and facility, for the attendance of department staff at public meetings and associated activities, and for the assessment of remediation activities concerning closed or old disposal sites or spill and incident clean-ups. The total fee charged for the review of an application or amendments to an application shall not exceed the actual documented costs incurred by the department in the performance of these activities and shall be subject to the maximum levels established in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2.5) of this section. Such review shall be completed within one hundred fifty days from date of issuance of the department's decision to begin its review. Moneys from the collection of such fees shall be credited to the solid waste management fund pursuant to the provisions of section

30-20-118

. Such moneys shall be used solely to support the application review process and to support the staff of the department involved with such process.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 882, § 9, effective July 1, 1998.)

The establishment of criteria for composting sites and facilities for which a certificate of designation is not required under section

30-20-102 (8)

.

(2.5) The solid and hazardous waste commission shall promulgate rules pertaining to the assessment of annual fees and document review and activity fees to offset program costs from solid waste disposal sites and facilities in accordance with the following requirements:

Annual fees shall be established for solid waste disposal sites and facilities that are not required to pay solid waste user fees imposed pursuant to section

25-16-104.5

, C.R.S. The fee imposed by this paragraph (a) shall not exceed five thousand dollars per year per facility; except that a monofill facility that contains coal combustion products shall be exempt from the fee imposed by this paragraph (a). The annual fee shall be uniform among owners of the same type of, and similarly sized, facility and shall consider the department's level of effort in regulating the facilities.

The hourly charge for the document review and activity fees shall be established at a rate comparable to industry rates for performing similar tasks with maximum levels on document review and activity fees that reflect timely and cost-effective reviews.

The department shall provide a receipt for the fees paid pursuant to this subsection (2.5), shall transmit such payments to the state treasurer, and accept the state treasurer's receipt in return for the payments transmitted. The state treasurer shall credit one hundred percent of the fees transmitted pursuant to this paragraph (c) to the solid waste management fund created in section

30-20-118 (1)

to be used by the department in carrying out its duties and responsibilities concerning solid waste management.

(2.7) If the department determines that a site or facility is or has been subject to payment of the annual fee requirements pursuant to subsection (2.5) of this section and has not paid any portion of the amount of fees due and owing, in addition to any other remedies the department may have in such circumstances as provided by law, the department may assess the site or facility an additional fee to offset program costs caused by the site or facility, which additional fee shall be equivalent to double the amount of the estimated annual fee, without interest, that the site or facility would have paid the department if the fee had been paid as required by law.

Any applicant aggrieved by a recommendation of the department concerning an application for a solid wastes disposal site and facility shall be entitled to a hearing and review pursuant to the provisions of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Any and all rules promulgated by the department of public health and environment prior to the transfer of its rule-making authority under this section to the state board of health shall remain in full force and effect after the date of such transfer.

All acts, orders, and rules adopted by the state board of health under the authority of this part 1 prior to July 1, 2006, that were valid prior to said date and not otherwise subject to judicial review shall, to the extent that they are not inconsistent with said part, be deemed and held to be legal and valid in all respects, as though issued by the solid and hazardous waste commission under the authority of this part 1. No provision of this part 1 shall be construed to validate any actions, orders, or rules that were not valid when adopted by the board of health prior to such date.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 761, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-9.

L. 71:

p. 343, § 10.

L. 85:

(1)(c) added, p. 1065, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 968, § 10, effective June 5; (1)(c) amended and (1)(d) and (2) added, pp. 958, 954, §§ 3, 2, 4, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(d) amended, p. 475, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 94:

IP(1), IP(2), and (2)(c)(I) amended and (4) added, p. 33, § 4, effective March 9; (2)(c)(I) and (4) amended, pp. 2616, 2620, 2800, §§ 26, 33, 559, effective July 1.

L. 95:

IP(2) and (2)(c) amended, p. 156, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2)(c)(I) amended, p. 33, § 1, effective March 18.

L. 98:

(1)(d), IP(2), (2)(b), and (2)(c) amended and (2)(d) added, p. 882, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

IP(1), IP(2), and (4) amended, p. 1136, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(d) and (2)(b) amended and (2.5) and (2.7) added, p. 1144, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1.5) added, p. 2168, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 2009:

IP(1.5)(c) amended and (1.5)(e) added, (HB 09-1056), ch. 301, p. 1607, § 3, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 91-160, Senate Bill 91-168, and Senate Bill 91-174 were harmonized. Amendments to subsection (2)(c)(I) by House Bill 94-1077 and House Bill 94-1029 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) In 2007, subsections (1)(d) and (2)(b) were amended by the "Recycling Resources Economic Opportunity Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 278, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting subsection (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 421, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

30-20-110. Minimum standards.

The rules promulgated by the solid and hazardous waste commission and implemented by the department shall contain the following minimum standards:

Such sites and facilities shall be located, operated, and maintained in a manner so as to control obnoxious odors and prevent rodent and insect breeding and infestation, and they shall be kept adequately covered during their use.

Such sites and facilities shall comply with the health laws, standards, rules, and regulations of the department, the water quality control commission, and all applicable zoning laws and ordinances.

No radioactive materials or materials contaminated by radioactive substances shall be disposed of in sites or facilities not specifically designated for that purpose.

A site and facility operated as a sanitary landfill shall provide means of finally disposing of solid wastes on land in a manner to minimize nuisance conditions such as odors, windblown debris, insects, rodents, and smoke; and shall provide compacted fill material; shall provide adequate cover with suitable material and surface drainage designed to prevent ponding and water and wind erosion and prevent water and air pollution; and, upon being filled, shall be left in a condition of orderliness and good esthetic appearance and capable of blending with the surrounding area. In the operation of such a site and facility, the solid wastes shall be distributed in the smallest area consistent with handling traffic to be unloaded; shall be placed in the most dense volume practicable using moisture and compaction or other method approved by the department; shall be fire, insect, and rodent resistant through the application of an adequate layer of inert material at regular intervals; and shall have a minimum of windblown debris which shall be collected regularly and placed into the fill.

Sites and facilities shall be adequately fenced so as to prevent waste material and debris from escaping therefrom, and material and debris shall not be allowed to accumulate along the fence line.

Solid wastes deposited at any site and facility shall not be burned, other than by incineration in accordance with a certificate of designation issued pursuant to section 30-20-105; except that, in extreme emergencies resulting in the generation of large quantities of combustible materials, authorization for burning under controlled conditions may be given by the department.

All facilities shall have a waste characterization plan approved by the department that is consistent with the certificate of designation for the facility. The plan shall outline screening methodologies and waste handling procedures and shall include a hazardous waste exclusion plan.

Material that is beneficially used shall be incorporated into the soil in the shortest time frame that is practicable, allowing for weather conditions. Materials that may be beneficially used under this section may not be stockpiled for long periods or used in such a manner that the material constitutes a public nuisance.

Minimum standards for facilities that do not need a certificate of designation under section 30-20-102 (5) shall include an annual report of quantities of materials managed at the site.

Such minimum standards shall require the reporting, documentation, or remediation of spills at illegal disposal sites, abandoned disposal sites, or contaminated sites.

Any provision of section 25-7-108, C.R.S., to the contrary notwithstanding, the board of county commissioners in any county with less than twenty-five thousand population, according to the latest federal census, and any municipality within a county which county has a population under ten thousand and subject to approval of the board of county commissioners, is authorized to develop regulations, by resolution or ordinance, permitting the noncommercial burning of trash in the unincorporated area and, if appropriate, the incorporated areas of said county; except that no permit shall be issued which shall allow the county, or municipality if appropriate, to exceed primary and secondary ambient air quality standards as prescribed by federal laws and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or which would contribute to any other county or municipality exceeding primary or secondary ambient air quality standards as prescribed by federal laws and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

As used in subsection (2) of this section, "noncommercial burning of trash" includes the burning of wood waste in wigwam wood waste burners.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 761, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-10.

L. 71:

p. 344, § 11.

L. 79:

(3) added, p. 1059, § 8, effective June 20; (1)(f) amended and (2) added, p. 1148, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 81:

IP(1) amended, p. 1359, § 4, effective June 19.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1284, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 98:

IP(1) amended and (1)(g) to (1)(j) added, p. 884, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

IP(1) amended, p. 1136, § 20, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Air Pollution Prevention and Control Act", see article 7 of title 25; for water quality control, see article 8 of title 25.

30-20-110.5. Beneficial use of biosolids - water quality control commission to set fees - fund created.

The water quality control commission shall establish, and may revise as necessary, a schedule of nonrefundable fees to cover the reasonable costs of implementing a program for the beneficial use of biosolids. Such fees shall be imposed upon the producers of biosolids that are applied for beneficial use. In no event shall the fee exceed two dollars and forty cents per dry ton of biosolids.

Repealed.

All fees collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the biosolids management program fund, which fund is hereby created. The moneys in such fund shall be subject to annual appropriation to the department by the general assembly, which shall review expenditures of such moneys to assure that they are used to accomplish the purposes of this section. Any interest earned on moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund to be used for purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 1042, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) repealed, pp. 1217, 1245, §§ 6, 111, effective August 7.

L. 2006:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1136, § 21, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

30-20-111. Departments to render assistance.

The department and county, district, and municipal public health agencies shall render technical advice and services to owners and operators of solid wastes disposal sites and facilities and to municipalities and counties in order to assure that appropriate measures are being taken to protect the public health, safety, and welfare. In addition, the department has the duty to coordinate the solid wastes program under this part 1 with all other programs within the department and with the other agencies of state and local government which are concerned with solid wastes disposal.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 761, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-12.

L. 71:

p. 344, § 12.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2119, § 165, effective August 11.

30-20-112. Revocation of certificate.

The governing body having jurisdiction, after reasonable notice and public hearing, shall temporarily suspend or revoke a certificate of designation that has been granted by it for failure of a site and facility to comply with all applicable laws, resolutions, and ordinances or to comply with the provisions of this part 1 or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 761, § 13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-13.

L. 71:

p. 344, § 13.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 970, § 11, effective June 5.